el: Μορφή βύνης: Σπασμένο; Σε νιφάδες; Αλεσμένο; Αποφλοιωμένο; Προζελατινοποιημένο; Καβουρδισμένο/διογκωμένο; Ολόκληρος κόκκος; Άλλο
hu: Maláta formája: Zúzott; Pelyhesített; Őrölt; Hántolt; Előzselatinizált; Pörkölt / puffasztott; Egész szemes; Egyéb
lt-LT: Salyklo forma: Traiškytas; Dribsniai; Maltas; Perlinis; Iš anksto želatinizuotas; Skrudintas / pūstas; Sveiki grūdai; Kita
fr: Forme du malt: Concassé; En flocons; Moulu; Perlé; Prégélatinisé; Torréfié / soufflé; Grain entier; Autre
zh-TW: 麥芽形式: 壓碎; 片狀; 研磨; 去殼; 預糊化; 烘烤/膨化; 整粒; 其他
da: Maltform: Valset; I flager; Malet; Poleret; Forgelatineret; Ristet/puffet; Hele kerner; Andet
nl: Mout vorm: Geschroot; Gevlokt; Gemalen; Gepareld; Voorgegelatineerd; Gepoft; Hele korrel; Anders
sv: Maltform: Krossad; Flingad; Mald; Pärlad; Förklistrad; Torrifierad/puffad; Helt korn; Annat
sl-SI: Oblika slada: Zdrobljen; V kosmičih; Mleto; Oluščen; Predhodno želatinizirano; Praženo/ekspandirano; Celo zrnje; Drugo
vi: Dạng mạch nha: Xay; Cán mỏng; Nghiền; Xát vỏ; Hồ hóa sẵn; Rang/Nổ phồng; Nguyên hạt; Khác
th: รูปแบบมอลต์: บด; แบบแผ่น; โม่; ขัดสี; พรีเจลาติไนซ์; คั่วด้วยความร้อน/พอง; เต็มเมล็ด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Forma sladu: Drvený; Vločkovaný; Mletý; Lúpaný; Predželatinizovaný; Pražený/pufovaný; Celé zrno; Iná
es: Forma de la malta: Triturada; En copos; Molida; Perlada; Pregelatinizada; Torrefacta/inflada; Grano entero; Otro
ko: 맥아 형태: 분쇄됨; 플레이크상; 빻은 상태; 펄 상태; 호화 처리됨; 토리파이드/퍼프 처리됨; 통알곡; 기타
it: Forma di malto: Macinato; In fiocchi; Macinato; Perlato; Pregelatinizzato; Torrefatto/soffiato; Chicco intero; Altro
pt-BR: Forma do malte: Triturado; Em flocos; Moído; Perolado; Pré-gelatinizado; Torrado/expandido; Grão inteiro; Outro
fi: Maltaan olomuoto: Rouhittu; Hiutaloitu; Jauhettu; Hiottu; Esigelatinoitu; Paahdettu/paisutettu; Kokonainen jyvä; Muu
de: Malzform: Geschrotet; Geflockt; Gemahlen; Graupen; Vorgelatiniert; Geröstet/Gepufft; Ganzes Korn; Sonstige
cs: Sladová forma: Drcený; Vločkový; Mletý; Kroupový (pearled); Předželatinovaný; Pražený/pufovaný; Celá zrna; Jiné
nb: Maltform: Knust; Flaket; Malt; Perlet; Forhåndsgelatinisert; Røstet/puffet; Helt korn; Annet
tr: Malt formu: Kırılmış; Pul; Öğütülmüş; İnci; Önceden jelleştirilmiş; Kavrulmuş/patlatılmış; Tam tane; Diğer
pt-PT: Forma do malte: Esmagado; Em flocos; Moído; Perolado; Pré-gelatinizado; Torrado/tufado; Grão inteiro; Outro
ru: Форма солода: Молотый; В хлопьях; Смолотый; Перловый; Преклейстеризованный; Обжаренный/воздушный; Цельное зерно; Другое
zh-CN: 麦芽形态: 粉碎; 压片; 研磨; 珍珠麦; 预糊化; 烘焙/膨化; 全谷粒; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik slada: Drobljeni; U pahuljicama; Mljeveni; Ljušteni; Prethodno želatinizirani; Prženi / ekspandirani; Cijelo zrno; Ostalo
pl: Forma słodu: Śrutowany; Płatkowany; Mielony; Perłowany; Wstępnie skleikowany; Prażony / dmuchany; Całe ziarna; Inne
en: Malt form: Crushed; Flaked; Milled; Pearled; Pre-gelatinized; Torrified/Puffed; Whole kernel; Other
bg-BG: Форма на малца: Смлян; На люспи; Млян; Перлен; Предварително желатинизиран; Експандиран/пукан; Цели зърна; Други
ro-RO: Forma malțului: Zdrobit; Sub formă de fulgi; Măcinat; Perlat; Pregelatinizat; Prăjit/expandat; Boabe întregi; Altele
ja: 麦芽形態: 粉砕済み; フレーク; ミルド; 丸麦 (パール); アルファ化済み; 膨化 (パフ) /熱処理済み; ホールカーネル (全粒); その他